Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2359.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 82.14.530 and 2021 c 27 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a)(i) A county legislative authority may submit an authorizing proposition to the county voters at a special or general election and, if the proposition is approved by a majority of persons voting, impose a sales and use tax in accordance with the terms of this chapter. The title of each ballot measure must clearly state the purposes for which the proposed sales and use tax will be used. The rate of tax under this section may not exceed ((one-tenth of one))0.1 percent of the selling price in the case of a sales tax, or value of the article used, in the case of a use tax.(ii) As an alternative to the authority provided in (a)(i) of this subsection, a county legislative authority may impose, without a proposition approved by a majority of persons voting, a sales and use tax in accordance with the terms of this chapter. The rate of tax under this section may not exceed ((one-tenth of one))0.1 percent of the selling price in the case of a sales tax, or value of the article used, in the case of a use tax.(b)(i) If a county does not impose the full tax rate authorized under (a) of this subsection by September 30, 2020, any city legislative authority located in that county may:(A) Submit an authorizing proposition to the city voters at a special or general election and, if the proposition is approved by a majority of persons voting, impose the whole or remainder of the sales and use tax rate in accordance with the terms of this chapter. The title of each ballot measure must clearly state the purposes for which the proposed sales and use tax will be used; or(B) Impose, without a proposition approved by a majority of persons voting, the whole or remainder of the sales and use tax rate in accordance with the terms of this chapter.(ii) The rate of tax under this section may not exceed ((one-tenth of one))0.1 percent of the selling price in the case of a sales tax, or value of the article used, in the case of a use tax.(iii) A county with a population of greater than ((one million five hundred thousand))1,500,000 may impose the tax authorized under (a)(ii) of this subsection only if the county plans to spend at least ((thirty))30 percent of the moneys collected under this section that are attributable to taxable activities or events within any city with a population greater than ((sixty thousand))60,000 located in that county within that city's boundaries.(c) If a county imposes a tax authorized under (a) of this subsection after a city located in that county has imposed the tax authorized under (b) of this subsection, the county must provide a credit against its tax for the full amount of tax imposed by a city.(d) The taxes authorized in this subsection are in addition to any other taxes authorized by law and must be collected from persons who are taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any taxable event within the county for a county's tax and within a city for a city's tax.(2)(a) Notwithstanding subsection (4) of this section, a minimum of ((sixty))60 percent of the moneys collected under this section must be used for the following purposes:(i) Constructing or acquiring affordable housing, which may include emergency, transitional, and supportive housing and new units of affordable housing within an existing structure, and facilities providing housing-related services, or acquiring land for these purposes; or(ii) Constructing or acquiring behavioral health-related facilities, or acquiring land for these purposes; or(iii) Funding the operations and maintenance costs of new and existing units of affordable housing and facilities where housing-related programs are provided, or newly constructed evaluation and treatment centers; or(iv) Rehabilitating existing affordable housing, which may include emergency, transitional, and supportive housing.(b) The affordable housing and facilities providing housing-related programs in (a)(i) of this subsection may only be provided to persons within any of the following population groups whose income is at or below ((sixty))60 percent of the median income of the county imposing the tax:(i) Persons with behavioral health disabilities;(ii) Veterans;(iii) Senior citizens;(iv) Persons who are homeless or at-risk of being homeless, including families with children;(v) Unaccompanied homeless youth or young adults;(vi) Persons with disabilities; or(vii) Domestic violence survivors.(c) The remainder of the moneys collected under this section must be used for the operation, delivery, or evaluation of behavioral health treatment programs and services, affordable and supportive housing operation and maintenance, or housing-related services.(3)(a) A county that imposes the tax under this section must consult with a city before the county may construct or acquire any of the facilities authorized under subsection (2)(a) of this section within the city limits.(b) Among other priorities, a county that acquires a facility under subsection (2)(a) of this section must provide an opportunity for 15 percent of the units provided at that facility to be provided to individuals who are living in or near the city in which the facility is located, or have ties to that community. The provisions of this subsection (3)(b) do not apply if the county is unable to identify sufficient individuals within the city in need of services that meet the criteria provided in subsection (2)(b) of this section. This prioritization must not jeopardize United States department of housing and urban development funding for the continuum of care program.(4) A county that has not imposed the tax authorized under RCW 82.14.460 prior to October 9, 2015, but imposes the tax authorized under this section after a city in that county has imposed the tax authorized under RCW 82.14.460 prior to October 9, 2015, must enter into an interlocal agreement with that city to determine how the services and provisions described in subsection (2) of this section will be allocated and funded in the city.(5) To carry out the purposes of subsection (2)(a) and (b) of this section, the legislative authority of the county or city imposing the tax has the authority to issue general obligation or revenue bonds within the limitations now or hereafter prescribed by the laws of this state, and may use, and is authorized to pledge, up to ((fifty))50 percent of the moneys collected under this section for repayment of such bonds, in order to finance the provision or construction of affordable housing, facilities where housing-related programs are provided, or evaluation and treatment centers described in subsection (2)(a)(iii) of this section.(6)(a) Moneys collected under this section may be used to offset reductions in state or federal funds for the purposes described in subsection (2) of this section.(b) No more than ((ten))10 percent of the moneys collected under this section may be used to supplant existing local funds.(7) A county or city may enter into an interlocal agreement with one or more counties, cities, or public housing authorities in accordance with chapter 39.34 RCW. The agreement may include, but is not limited to, pooling the tax receipts received under this section, pledging those taxes to bonds issued by one or more parties to the agreement, and allocating the proceeds of the taxes levied or the bonds issued in accordance with such interlocal agreement and this section.Sec. 2. RCW 82.14.540 and 2024 c 136 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(a) "Nonparticipating city" is a city that does not impose a sales and use tax in accordance with the terms of this section.(b) "Nonparticipating county" is a county that does not impose a sales and use tax in accordance with the terms of this section.(c) "Participating city" is a city that imposes a sales and use tax in accordance with the terms of this section.(d) "Participating county" is a county that imposes a sales and use tax in accordance with the terms of this section.(e) "Qualifying local tax" means the following tax sources, if the tax source is instated no later than ((twelve))12 months after July 28, 2019:(i) The affordable housing levy authorized under RCW 84.52.105;(ii) The sales and use tax for housing and related services authorized under RCW 82.14.530, provided the city has imposed the tax at a minimum or of at least half of the authorized rate;(iii) The sales tax for chemical dependency and mental health treatment services or therapeutic courts authorized under RCW 82.14.460 imposed by a city; and(iv) The levy authorized under RCW 84.55.050, if used solely for affordable housing.(2)(a) A county or city legislative authority may authorize, fix, and impose a sales and use tax in accordance with the terms of this section.(b) The tax under this section is assessed on the selling price in the case of a sales tax, or value of the article used, in the case of a use tax.(c) The rate of the tax under this section for an individual participating city and an individual participating county may not exceed:(i) Beginning on July 28, 2019, until ((twelve))12 months after July 28, 2019:(A) 0.0073 percent for a:(I) Participating city, unless the participating city levies a qualifying local tax; and(II) Participating county, within the limits of nonparticipating cities within the county and within participating cities that do not currently levy a qualifying tax;(B) 0.0146 percent for a:(I) Participating city that currently levies a qualifying local tax;(II) Participating city if the county in which it is located declares they will not levy the sales and use tax authorized under this section or does not adopt a resolution in accordance with this section; and(III) Participating county within the unincorporated areas of the county and any city that declares they will not levy the sales and use tax authorized under this section or does not adopt a resolution in accordance with this section;(ii) Beginning ((twelve))12 months after July 28, 2019:(A) 0.0073 percent for a:(I) Participating city that is located within a participating county if the participating city is not levying a qualifying local tax; and(II) Participating county, within the limits of a participating city if the participating city is not levying a qualifying local tax;(B) 0.0146 percent within the limits of a:(I) Participating city that is levying a qualifying local tax; and(II) Participating county within the unincorporated area of the county and within the limits of any nonparticipating city that is located within the county.(d) A county may not levy the tax authorized under this section within the limits of a participating city that levies a qualifying local tax.(e)(i) In order for a county or city legislative authority to impose the tax under this section, the authority must adopt:(A) A resolution of intent to adopt legislation to authorize the maximum capacity of the tax in this section within six months of July 28, 2019; and(B) Legislation to authorize the maximum capacity of the tax in this section within one year of July 28, 2019.(ii) Adoption of the resolution of intent and legislation requires simple majority approval of the enacting legislative authority.(iii) If a county or city has not adopted a resolution of intent in accordance with the terms of this section, the county or city may not authorize, fix, and impose the tax.(3) The tax imposed under this section must be deducted from the amount of tax otherwise required to be collected or paid to the department of revenue under chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW. The department must perform the collection of such taxes on behalf of the county or city at no cost to the county or city.(4) By December 31, 2019, or within ((thirty))30 days of a county or city authorizing the tax under this section, whichever is later, the department must calculate the maximum amount of tax distributions for each county and city authorizing the tax under this section as follows:(a) The maximum amount for a participating county equals the taxable retail sales within the county in state fiscal year 2019 multiplied by the tax rate imposed under this section. If a county imposes a tax authorized under this section after a city located in that county has imposed the tax, the taxable retail sales within the city in state fiscal year 2019 must be subtracted from the taxable retail sales within the county for the calculation of the maximum amount; and(b) The maximum amount for a city equals the taxable retail sales within the city in state fiscal year 2019 multiplied by the tax rate imposed under subsection (1) of this section.(5) The tax must cease to be distributed to a county or city for the remainder of any fiscal year in which the amount of tax exceeds the maximum amount in subsection (4) of this section. The department must remit any annual tax revenues above the maximum to the state treasurer for deposit in the general fund. Distributions to a county or city meeting the maximum amount must resume at the beginning of the next fiscal year.(6)(a) The moneys collected or bonds issued under this section may only be used for the following purposes:(i) Acquiring, rehabilitating, or constructing affordable housing, which may include new units of affordable housing within an existing structure or facilities providing supportive housing services under RCW 71.24.385;(ii) Funding the operations and maintenance costs of new and existing units of affordable or supportive housing; or(iii) For providing rental assistance to tenants.(b) Administrative costs of the county or city associated with administering this section may not exceed 10 percent of the annual tax distributed to the jurisdiction under this section.(7) The housing and services provided pursuant to subsection (6) of this section may only be provided to persons whose income is at or below 60 percent of the median income of the county or city imposing the tax, or at or below 80 percent of the median income of the county or city imposing the tax if it is supporting the development of affordable housing intended for owner occupancy, as defined in RCW 84.14.010.(8) In determining the use of funds under subsection (6) of this section, a county or city must consider the income of the individuals and families to be served, the leveraging of the resources made available under this section, and the housing needs within the jurisdiction of the taxing authority.(9) To carry out the purposes of this section including, but not limited to, financing loans or grants to nonprofit organizations or public housing authorities, the legislative authority of the county or city imposing the tax has the authority to issue general obligation or revenue bonds within the limitations now or hereafter prescribed by the laws of this state, and may use, and is authorized to pledge, the moneys collected under this section for repayment of such bonds.(10) A county or city may enter into an interlocal agreement with one or more counties, cities, or public housing authorities in accordance with chapter 39.34 RCW. The agreement may include, but is not limited to, pooling the tax receipts received under this section, pledging those taxes to bonds issued by one or more parties to the agreement, and allocating the proceeds of the taxes levied or the bonds issued in accordance with such interlocal agreement and this section.(11) Counties and cities imposing the tax under this section must report annually to the department of commerce on the collection and use of the revenue. The department of commerce must adopt rules prescribing content of such reports. By December 1, 2019, and annually thereafter, and in compliance with RCW 43.01.036, the department of commerce must submit a report annually to the appropriate legislative committees with regard to such uses.(12) The tax imposed by a county or city under this section expires ((twenty))20 years after the date on which the tax is first imposed.Sec. 3. RCW 36.22.250 and 2025 c 408 s 3, 2025 c 100 s 2, and 2025 c 74 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:(1) A surcharge of $183 per instrument shall be charged by the county auditor for each document recorded, which will be in addition to any other charge authorized by law. The following are exempt from this surcharge:(a) Documents recording a birth, marriage, divorce, or death;(b) Any recorded documents otherwise exempted from a recording fee or additional surcharges under state law;(c) Marriage licenses issued by the county auditor; and(d) Documents recording a federal, state, county, city, or water-sewer district, or wage lien or satisfaction of lien.(2) Funds collected pursuant to this section must be distributed and used as follows:(a) One percent of the total funds collected shall be retained by the county auditor for its fee collection activities;(b) 30 percent of the total funds collected shall be retained by the county and used by the county as provided in subsection (3) of this section;(c) 54.1 percent of the total funds collected shall be transmitted to the state treasurer to be deposited in the home security fund account created in RCW 43.185C.060 and shall be used by the department of commerce as provided in subsection (4) of this section;(d) 13.1 percent of the total funds collected shall be transmitted to the state treasurer to be deposited in the affordable housing for all account created in RCW 43.185C.190 and shall be used by the department of commerce as provided in subsection (5) of this section;(e) 1.8 percent of the total funds collected shall be transmitted to the state treasurer to be deposited in the landlord mitigation program account created in RCW 43.31.615 and shall be used by the department of commerce as provided in subsection (6) of this section.(3) The county shall use their portion of the collected funds as follows:(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, up to 10 percent for the county's administration and local distribution of the funds collected from the surcharge in this section, and administrative costs related to the county's homeless housing plan;(b)(i) At least 75 percent will be retained and used by the county to accomplish the purposes of its local homeless housing plan pursuant to chapter 484, Laws of 2005, unless a city in the county elects, as authorized in RCW 43.185C.080, to operate its own local homeless housing program.(ii) If a city in the county elects, as authorized in RCW 43.185C.080, to operate its own local homeless housing program, the 10 percent for administrative costs retained under (a) of this subsection and the 75 percent for local homeless housing plans retained under (b) of this subsection must be combined and distributed as follows: For each city in the county that elects as authorized in RCW 43.185C.080 to operate its own local homeless housing program, a percentage of the surcharge assessed under this subsection equal to the percentage of the city's local portion of the real estate excise tax collected by the county shall be transmitted at least quarterly to the city treasurer, without any deduction for county administrative costs, for use by the city for program costs which directly contribute to the goals of the city's local homeless housing plan. Each county or city receiving funds under this subsection (3) may use up to 10 percent of their share of the total funding retained or received under this subsection (3) after the completion of the required city distributions for costs related to:(A) The county's administration and local distribution of the funds collected from the surcharge in this section;(B) Administrative costs related to the county's homeless housing plan; and(C) Administrative costs related to the city's homeless housing program;(c) At least 15 percent will be retained and used by the county for eligible housing activities, as described in this subsection, that serve extremely low and very low-income households in the county and the cities within a county according to an interlocal agreement between the county and the cities within the county consistent with countywide and local housing needs and policies. A priority must be given to eligible housing activities that serve extremely low-income households with incomes at or below 30 percent of the area median income. Eligible housing activities to be funded are limited to:(i) Acquisition, construction, or rehabilitation of housing projects or units within housing projects that are affordable to very low-income households with incomes at or below 50 percent of the area median income, including units for homeownership, rental units, seasonal and permanent farmworker housing units, units reserved for victims of human trafficking and their families, and single room occupancy units;(ii) Supporting building operation and maintenance costs of housing projects or units within housing projects eligible to receive housing trust funds, that are affordable to very low-income households with incomes at or below 50 percent of the area median income, and that require a supplement to rent income to cover ongoing operating expenses;(iii) Rental assistance vouchers for housing units that are affordable to very low-income households with incomes at or below 50 percent of the area median income, including rental housing vouchers for victims of human trafficking and their families, to be administered by a local public housing authority or other local organization that has an existing rental assistance voucher program, consistent with or similar to the United States department of housing and urban development's section 8 rental assistance voucher program standards; and(iv) Operating costs for emergency shelters and licensed overnight youth shelters.(4) The department of commerce shall use the funds from the document recording fee or other fund sources deposited in the home security fund account as follows, except that the department of commerce shall provide counties with the right of first refusal to receive grant funds distributed under (b) of this subsection (4). If a county refuses the funds or does not respond within a time frame established by the department, the department shall make good faith efforts to identify one or more suitable alternative grantees operating within that county. The alternative grantee shall distribute the funds in a manner that is in compliance with this chapter. Funding provided through the office of homeless youth prevention and protection programs created in RCW 43.330.705 is exempt from the county first refusal requirement.(a) Up to 10 percent for administration of the programs established in chapter 43.185C RCW and in conformance with this subsection (4), including the costs of creating and implementing strategic plans, collecting and evaluating data, measuring and reporting performance, providing technical assistance to local governments, providing training to entities delivering services, and developing and maintaining stakeholder relationships;(b) At least 90 percent for homelessness assistance grant programs administered by the department, including but not limited to: Temporary rental assistance; eviction prevention rental assistance per RCW 43.185C.185; emergency shelter and transitional housing operations and maintenance; outreach; diversion; HOPE and crisis residential centers; young adult housing; homeless services and case management for adult, family, youth, and young adult homeless populations and those at risk of homelessness; project-based vouchers for nonprofit housing providers or public housing authorities; tenant-based rent assistance; housing services; direct cash assistance as provided for in RCW 43.185C.220(5)(a); rapid rehousing; emergency housing; acquisition; operations; maintenance; and service costs for permanent supportive housing as defined in RCW 36.70A.030 for individuals with disabilities. Grantees may also use these funds in partnership with permanent supportive housing programs administered by the office of apple health and homes created in RCW 43.330.181. Priority for use must be given to purposes intended to house persons who are chronically homeless or to maintain housing for individuals with disabilities and prior experiences of homelessness, including families with children.(5) The department of commerce shall use the funds from the document recording fee or other fund sources deposited in the affordable housing for all account as follows:(a) Up to 10 percent for program administration and technical assistance necessary for the delivery programs and activities under this subsection (5);(b) At least 90 percent for the following:(i) Grants for building operation and maintenance costs of housing projects, or units within housing projects, that are in the state's housing trust fund portfolio((,))and are affordable to extremely low-income households with incomes at or below 30 percent of the area median income((, and require a supplement to rent income to cover ongoing operating expenses))at the time of move-in;(ii) Grants to support the building operations, maintenance, and supportive service costs for permanent supportive housing projects, or units within housing projects, that have received or will receive funding from the housing trust fund or other public capital funding programs. The supported projects or units must be dedicated as permanent supportive housing as defined in RCW 36.70A.030((,))and be occupied by extremely low-income households with incomes at or below 30 percent of the area median income((, and require a supplement to rent income to cover ongoing property operations, maintenance, and supportive services expenses))at the time of move-in. Eligible uses of grant funds under this subsection (5)(b)(ii) include, but are not limited to:(A) Resident services, such as programming, community events, and building activities, including meals and supplies;(B) Essential ancillary services necessary to assist program participants who are not covered or are partially covered by medicaid or other health insurance obtain and maintain housing. These services may include, but are not limited to, annual assessments of services, case management, education services, employment assistance and job training, counseling, life skills training, mental health services, outpatient health services, outreach, substance use treatment, transportation, and other support services;(C) Resident needs for basic living and well-being, such as hygiene products, housewares, and food; essential household goods; and transportation support for health care, treatment, and case management;(D) Essential maintenance and upkeep, including repair and replacement of fixtures needed for basic building functionality and occupational safety, such as lighting, security systems, locks and key systems, and window and door hardware; and required operational replacement reserves; and(E) Essential case management and other resources with demonstrable connection to resident well-being and housing stability, such as communal information technology hardware and software for resource navigation and telehealth appointments, 24/7 security and safety staff, and on-call resident emergency response.(6) The department of commerce shall use the funds from the document recording fee or other fund sources deposited in the landlord mitigation program account to administer the landlord mitigation program as established in RCW 43.31.605. The department of commerce may use up to 10 percent of these funds for program administration and the development and maintenance of a database necessary to administer the program.(7) When awarding grants under subsection (5)(b)(i) and (ii) of this section, the department of commerce:(a) May not impose a cap on administrative or overhead costs for grantees of less than 15 percent of the grant award; and(b) Shall seek to promote continuity of operations and stability for existing projects including by maintaining renewal grant amounts at levels sufficient to support ongoing operations.(8) The department of commerce shall require grantees to maintain comprehensive records for all expenses above $50 and require submission of documentation, upon request, for auditing purposes.Sec. 4. RCW 82.45.010 and 2025 c 159 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1) As used in this chapter, the term "sale" has its ordinary meaning and includes any conveyance, grant, assignment, quitclaim, or transfer of the ownership of or title to real property, including standing timber, or any estate or interest therein for a valuable consideration, and any contract for such conveyance, grant, assignment, quitclaim, or transfer, and any lease with an option to purchase real property, including standing timber, or any estate or interest therein or other contract under which possession of the property is given to the purchaser, or any other person at the purchaser's direction, and title to the property is retained by the vendor as security for the payment of the purchase price. The term also includes the grant, assignment, quitclaim, sale, or transfer of improvements constructed upon leased land.(2)(a) The term "sale" also includes the transfer or acquisition within any 36 month period of a controlling interest in any entity with an interest in real property located in this state for a valuable consideration.(b) For the sole purpose of determining whether, pursuant to the exercise of an option, a controlling interest was transferred or acquired within a 36 month period, the date that the option agreement was executed is the date on which the transfer or acquisition of the controlling interest is deemed to occur. For all other purposes under this chapter, the date upon which the option is exercised is the date of the transfer or acquisition of the controlling interest.(c) For purposes of this subsection, all acquisitions of persons acting in concert must be aggregated for purposes of determining whether a transfer or acquisition of a controlling interest has taken place. The department must adopt standards by rule to determine when persons are acting in concert. In adopting a rule for this purpose, the department must consider the following:(i) Persons must be treated as acting in concert when they have a relationship with each other such that one person influences or controls the actions of another through common ownership; and(ii) When persons are not commonly owned or controlled, they must be treated as acting in concert only when the unity with which the purchasers have negotiated and will consummate the transfer of ownership interests supports a finding that they are acting as a single entity. If the acquisitions are completely independent, with each purchaser buying without regard to the identity of the other purchasers, then the acquisitions are considered separate acquisitions.(3) The term "sale" does not include:(a) A transfer by gift, devise, or inheritance.(b) A transfer by transfer on death deed, to the extent that it is not in satisfaction of a contractual obligation of the decedent owed to the recipient of the property.(c) A transfer of any leasehold interest other than of the type mentioned above.(d) A cancellation or forfeiture of a vendee's interest in a contract for the sale of real property, whether or not such contract contains a forfeiture clause, or deed in lieu of foreclosure of a mortgage.(e) The partition of property by tenants in common by agreement or as the result of a court decree.(f) The assignment of property or interest in property from one spouse or one domestic partner to the other spouse or other domestic partner in accordance with the terms of a decree of dissolution of marriage or state registered domestic partnership or in fulfillment of a property settlement agreement.(g) The assignment or other transfer of a vendor's interest in a contract for the sale of real property, even though accompanied by a conveyance of the vendor's interest in the real property involved.(h) Transfers by appropriation or decree in condemnation proceedings brought by the United States, the state or any political subdivision thereof, or a municipal corporation.(i) A mortgage or other transfer of an interest in real property merely to secure a debt, or the assignment thereof.(j) Any transfer or conveyance made pursuant to a deed of trust or an order of sale by the court in any mortgage, deed of trust, or lien foreclosure proceeding or upon execution of a judgment, or deed in lieu of foreclosure to satisfy a mortgage or deed of trust.(k) A conveyance to the federal housing administration or veterans administration by an authorized mortgagee made pursuant to a contract of insurance or guaranty with the federal housing administration or veterans administration.(l) A transfer in compliance with the terms of any lease or contract upon which the tax as imposed by this chapter has been paid or where the lease or contract was entered into prior to the date this tax was first imposed.(m) The sale of any grave or lot in an established cemetery.(n) A sale by the United States, this state or any political subdivision thereof, or a municipal corporation of this state.(o) A sale to a regional transit authority or public corporation under RCW 81.112.320 under a sale/leaseback agreement under RCW 81.112.300.(p) A transfer of real property, however effected, if it consists of a mere change in identity or form of ownership of an entity where there is no change in the beneficial ownership. These include transfers to a corporation or partnership which is wholly owned by the transferor and/or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner or children of the transferor or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner. However, if thereafter such transferee corporation or partnership voluntarily transfers such real property, or such transferor, spouse or domestic partner, or children of the transferor or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner voluntarily transfer stock in the transferee corporation or interest in the transferee partnership capital, as the case may be, to other than (i) the transferor and/or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner or children of the transferor or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner, (ii) a trust having the transferor and/or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner or children of the transferor or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner as the only beneficiaries at the time of the transfer to the trust, or (iii) a corporation or partnership wholly owned by the original transferor and/or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner or children of the transferor or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner, within three years of the original transfer to which this exemption applies, and the tax on the subsequent transfer has not been paid within 60 days of becoming due, excise taxes become due and payable on the original transfer as otherwise provided by law.(q)(i) A transfer that for federal income tax purposes does not involve the recognition of gain or loss for entity formation, liquidation or dissolution, and reorganization, including but not limited to nonrecognition of gain or loss because of application of 26 U.S.C. Sec. 332, 337, 351, 368(a)(1), 721, or 731 of the internal revenue code of 1986, as amended.(ii) However, the transfer described in (q)(i) of this subsection cannot be preceded or followed within a 36 month period by another transfer or series of transfers, that, when combined with the otherwise exempt transfer or transfers described in (q)(i) of this subsection, results in the transfer of a controlling interest in the entity for valuable consideration, and in which one or more persons previously holding a controlling interest in the entity receive cash or property in exchange for any interest the person or persons acting in concert hold in the entity. This subsection (3)(q)(ii) does not apply to that part of the transfer involving property received that is the real property interest that the person or persons originally contributed to the entity or when one or more persons who did not contribute real property or belong to the entity at a time when real property was purchased receive cash or personal property in exchange for that person or persons' interest in the entity. The real estate excise tax under this subsection (3)(q)(ii) is imposed upon the person or persons who previously held a controlling interest in the entity.(r) A qualified sale of a manufactured/mobile home community, as defined in RCW 59.20.030.(s)(i) A transfer of a qualified low-income housing development or controlling interest in a qualified low-income housing development, unless, due to noncompliance with federal statutory requirements, the seller is subject to recapture, in whole or in part, of its allocated federal low-income housing tax credits within the four years prior to the date of transfer.(ii) For purposes of this subsection (3)(s), "qualified low-income housing development" means real property and improvements in respect to which the seller or, in the case of a transfer of a controlling interest, the owner or beneficial owner, was allocated federal low-income housing tax credits authorized under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 42 or successor statute, by the Washington state housing finance commission or successor state-authorized tax credit allocating agency.(iii) This subsection (3)(s) does not apply to transfers of a qualified low-income housing development or controlling interest in a qualified low-income housing development occurring on or after July 1, 2035.(iv) The Washington state housing finance commission, in consultation with the department, must gather data on: (A) The fiscal savings, if any, accruing to transferees as a result of the exemption provided in this subsection (3)(s); (B) the extent to which transferors of qualified low-income housing developments receive consideration, including any assumption of debt, as part of a transfer subject to the exemption provided in this subsection (3)(s); and (C) the continued use of the property for low-income housing. The Washington state housing finance commission must provide this information to the joint legislative audit and review committee. The committee must conduct a review of the tax preference created under this subsection (3)(s) in calendar year 2033, as required under chapter 43.136 RCW.(t)(i) A qualified transfer of residential property by a legal representative of a person with developmental disabilities to a qualified entity subject to the following conditions:(A) The adult child with developmental disabilities of the transferor of the residential property must be allowed to reside in the residence or successor property so long as the placement is safe and appropriate as determined by the department of social and health services;(B) The title to the residential property is conveyed without the receipt of consideration by the legal representative of a person with developmental disabilities to a qualified entity;(C) The residential property must have no more than four living units located on it; and(D) The residential property transferred must remain in continued use for 50 years by the qualified entity as supported living for persons with developmental disabilities by the qualified entity or successor entity. If the qualified entity sells or otherwise conveys ownership of the residential property the proceeds of the sale or conveyance must be used to acquire similar residential property and such similar residential property must be considered the successor for continued use. The property will not be considered in continued use if the department of social and health services finds that the property has failed, after a reasonable time to remedy, to meet any health and safety statutory or regulatory requirements. If the department of social and health services determines that the property fails to meet the requirements for continued use, the department of social and health services must notify the department and the real estate excise tax based on the value of the property at the time of the transfer into use as residential property for persons with developmental disabilities becomes immediately due and payable by the qualified entity. The tax due is not subject to penalties, fees, or interest under this title.(ii) For the purposes of this subsection (3)(t) the definitions in RCW 71A.10.020 apply.(iii) A "qualified entity" is:(A) A nonprofit organization under Title 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue code of 1986, as amended, as of June 7, 2018, or a subsidiary under the same taxpayer identification number that provides residential supported living for persons with developmental disabilities; or(B) A nonprofit adult family home, as defined in RCW 70.128.010, that exclusively serves persons with developmental disabilities.(iv) In order to receive an exemption under this subsection (3)(t) an affidavit must be submitted by the transferor of the residential property and must include a copy of the transfer agreement and any other documentation as required by the department.(u)(i) The sale by an affordable homeownership facilitator of self-help housing to a low-income household.(ii) The definitions in this subsection (3)(u) apply to this subsection (3)(u) unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(A) "Affordable homeownership facilitator" means a nonprofit community or neighborhood-based organization that is exempt from income tax under Title 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c) of the internal revenue code of 1986, as amended, as of October 1, 2019, and that is the developer of self-help housing.(B) "Low-income" means household income as defined by the department, provided that the definition may not exceed 80 percent of median household income, adjusted for household size, for the county in which the dwelling is located.(C) "Self-help housing" means dwelling residences provided for ownership by low-income individuals and families whose ownership requirement includes labor participation. "Self-help housing" does not include residential rental housing provided on a commercial basis to the general public.(v)(i) A sale or transfer of real property to a qualifying grantee that uses the property for housing for low-income persons and receives or otherwise qualifies the property for an exemption from real and personal property taxes under RCW 84.36.560, 84.36.049, 35.82.210, 35.21.755, or 84.36.010. For purposes of this subsection (3)(v), "qualifying grantee" means a nonprofit entity as defined in RCWÂ  84.36.560, a nonprofit entity or qualified cooperative association as defined in RCW 84.36.049, a housing authority created under RCWÂ  35.82.030Â orÂ  35.82.300, a public corporation established under RCWÂ  35.21.660Â orÂ  35.21.730, or a county or municipal corporation. A qualifying grantee that is a county or municipal corporation must record a covenant at the time of transfer that prohibits using the property for any purpose other than for low-income housing for a period of at least 10 years. At a minimum, the covenant must address price restrictions and household income limits for the low-income housing. A qualifying grantee must comply with the requirements described in (v)(i)(A), (B), or (C) of this subsection and must also certify, by affidavit at the time of sale or transfer, that it intends to comply with those requirements.(A) If the qualifying grantee intends to operate existing housing on the property, within ((one year))24 months of the sale or transfer:(I) The qualifying grantee must receive or qualify the property for a tax exemption under RCWÂ  84.36.560, 84.36.049, 35.82.210,Â  35.21.755, orÂ  84.36.010; and(II) The property must be used as housing for low-income persons.(B) If the qualifying grantee intends to develop new housing on the site, within five years of the sale or transfer:(I) The qualifying grantee must receive or qualify the property for a tax exemption under RCWÂ  84.36.560, 84.36.049, 35.82.210,Â  35.21.755, orÂ  84.36.010; and(II) The property must be used as housing for low-income persons.(C) If the qualifying grantee intends to substantially rehabilitate the premises as defined in RCWÂ  59.18.200, within three years:(I) The qualifying grantee must receive or qualify the property for a tax exemption under RCWÂ  84.36.560, 84.36.049, 35.82.210,Â  35.21.755, orÂ  84.36.010; and(II) The property must be used as housing for low-income persons.(ii) If the qualifying grantee fails to satisfy the requirements described in (v)(i)(A), (B), or (C) of this subsection, within the timelines described in (v)(i)(A), (B), or (C) of this subsection, the qualifying grantee must pay the tax that would have otherwise been due at the time of initial transfer, plus interest calculated from the date of initial transfer pursuant to RCWÂ  82.32.050.(iii) If a qualifying grantee transfers the property to a different qualifying grantee within the original timelines described in (v)(i)(A), (B), or (C) of this subsection, neither the original qualifying grantee nor the new qualifying grantee is required toÂ pay the tax, so long as the new qualifying grantee satisfies the requirements as described in (v)(i)(A), (B), or (C) of this subsection within the exemption period of the initial transfer. If the new qualifying grantee fails to satisfy the requirements described in (v)(i)(A), (B), or (C) of this subsection, only the new qualifying grantee is liable for the payment of taxes required by (v)(ii) of this subsection. There is no limit on the number of transfers between qualifying grantees within the original timelines.(iv) Each affidavit must be filed with the department upon completion of the sale or transfer of property, including transfers from a qualifying grantee to a different qualifying grantee. The qualifying grantee must provide proof to the department as required by the department once the requirements as described in (v)(i)(A), (B), or (C) of this subsection have been satisfied.(v) For the purposes of this subsection (3)(v), "low-income" has the same meaning as in (u) of this subsection.(w)(i) Beginning January 1, 2026, the sale of qualified space in a development that qualifies for a property tax exemption under RCW 84.36.560, 84.36.049, 35.82.210, 35.21.755, or 84.36.010 to a nonprofit organization, a housing authority, or public corporation for use for an exempt community purpose.(ii) For the purposes of this subsection (3)(w), the following definitions apply:(A) "Affordable housing development" means a development with housing provided to households with a household income that does not exceed 80 percent of median household income at initial occupancy, adjusted for household size, for the county in which the dwelling is located.(B) "Exempt community purpose" means any use to provide a service that benefits affordable housing development tenants or the public including, but not limited to, health clinics, senior day care, food banks, community centers, and early learning facilities.(C) "Nonprofit organization" means an organization exempt from taxation under section 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3)), as amended.(D) "Qualified space" means any portion of an affordable housing development that is accessible to tenants or the public that constitutes a separate legal parcel of property under chapter 64.32, 64.34, or 64.90 RCW.Sec. 5. RCW 82.45.010 and 2025 c 159 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:(1) As used in this chapter, the term "sale" has its ordinary meaning and includes any conveyance, grant, assignment, quitclaim, or transfer of the ownership of or title to real property, including standing timber, or any estate or interest therein for a valuable consideration, and any contract for such conveyance, grant, assignment, quitclaim, or transfer, and any lease with an option to purchase real property, including standing timber, or any estate or interest therein or other contract under which possession of the property is given to the purchaser, or any other person at the purchaser's direction, and title to the property is retained by the vendor as security for the payment of the purchase price. The term also includes the grant, assignment, quitclaim, sale, or transfer of improvements constructed upon leased land.(2)(a) The term "sale" also includes the transfer or acquisition within any 36 month period of a controlling interest in any entity with an interest in real property located in this state for a valuable consideration.(b) For the sole purpose of determining whether, pursuant to the exercise of an option, a controlling interest was transferred or acquired within a 36 month period, the date that the option agreement was executed is the date on which the transfer or acquisition of the controlling interest is deemed to occur. For all other purposes under this chapter, the date upon which the option is exercised is the date of the transfer or acquisition of the controlling interest.(c) For purposes of this subsection, all acquisitions of persons acting in concert must be aggregated for purposes of determining whether a transfer or acquisition of a controlling interest has taken place. The department must adopt standards by rule to determine when persons are acting in concert. In adopting a rule for this purpose, the department must consider the following:(i) Persons must be treated as acting in concert when they have a relationship with each other such that one person influences or controls the actions of another through common ownership; and(ii) When persons are not commonly owned or controlled, they must be treated as acting in concert only when the unity with which the purchasers have negotiated and will consummate the transfer of ownership interests supports a finding that they are acting as a single entity. If the acquisitions are completely independent, with each purchaser buying without regard to the identity of the other purchasers, then the acquisitions are considered separate acquisitions.(3) The term "sale" does not include:(a) A transfer by gift, devise, or inheritance.(b) A transfer by transfer on death deed, to the extent that it is not in satisfaction of a contractual obligation of the decedent owed to the recipient of the property.(c) A transfer of any leasehold interest other than of the type mentioned above.(d) A cancellation or forfeiture of a vendee's interest in a contract for the sale of real property, whether or not such contract contains a forfeiture clause, or deed in lieu of foreclosure of a mortgage.(e) The partition of property by tenants in common by agreement or as the result of a court decree.(f) The assignment of property or interest in property from one spouse or one domestic partner to the other spouse or other domestic partner in accordance with the terms of a decree of dissolution of marriage or state registered domestic partnership or in fulfillment of a property settlement agreement.(g) The assignment or other transfer of a vendor's interest in a contract for the sale of real property, even though accompanied by a conveyance of the vendor's interest in the real property involved.(h) Transfers by appropriation or decree in condemnation proceedings brought by the United States, the state or any political subdivision thereof, or a municipal corporation.(i) A mortgage or other transfer of an interest in real property merely to secure a debt, or the assignment thereof.(j) Any transfer or conveyance made pursuant to a deed of trust or an order of sale by the court in any mortgage, deed of trust, or lien foreclosure proceeding or upon execution of a judgment, or deed in lieu of foreclosure to satisfy a mortgage or deed of trust.(k) A conveyance to the federal housing administration or veterans administration by an authorized mortgagee made pursuant to a contract of insurance or guaranty with the federal housing administration or veterans administration.(l) A transfer in compliance with the terms of any lease or contract upon which the tax as imposed by this chapter has been paid or where the lease or contract was entered into prior to the date this tax was first imposed.(m) The sale of any grave or lot in an established cemetery.(n) A sale by the United States, this state or any political subdivision thereof, or a municipal corporation of this state.(o) A sale to a regional transit authority or public corporation under RCW 81.112.320 under a sale/leaseback agreement under RCW 81.112.300.(p) A transfer of real property, however effected, if it consists of a mere change in identity or form of ownership of an entity where there is no change in the beneficial ownership. These include transfers to a corporation or partnership which is wholly owned by the transferor and/or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner or children of the transferor or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner. However, if thereafter such transferee corporation or partnership voluntarily transfers such real property, or such transferor, spouse or domestic partner, or children of the transferor or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner voluntarily transfer stock in the transferee corporation or interest in the transferee partnership capital, as the case may be, to other than (i) the transferor and/or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner or children of the transferor or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner, (ii) a trust having the transferor and/or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner or children of the transferor or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner as the only beneficiaries at the time of the transfer to the trust, or (iii) a corporation or partnership wholly owned by the original transferor and/or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner or children of the transferor or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner, within three years of the original transfer to which this exemption applies, and the tax on the subsequent transfer has not been paid within sixty days of becoming due, excise taxes become due and payable on the original transfer as otherwise provided by law.(q)(i) A transfer that for federal income tax purposes does not involve the recognition of gain or loss for entity formation, liquidation or dissolution, and reorganization, including but not limited to nonrecognition of gain or loss because of application of 26 U.S.C. Sec. 332, 337, 351, 368(a)(1), 721, or 731 of the internal revenue code of 1986, as amended.(ii) However, the transfer described in (q)(i) of this subsection cannot be preceded or followed within a 36 month period by another transfer or series of transfers, that, when combined with the otherwise exempt transfer or transfers described in (q)(i) of this subsection, results in the transfer of a controlling interest in the entity for valuable consideration, and in which one or more persons previously holding a controlling interest in the entity receive cash or property in exchange for any interest the person or persons acting in concert hold in the entity. This subsection (3)(q)(ii) does not apply to that part of the transfer involving property received that is the real property interest that the person or persons originally contributed to the entity or when one or more persons who did not contribute real property or belong to the entity at a time when real property was purchased receive cash or personal property in exchange for that person or persons' interest in the entity. The real estate excise tax under this subsection (3)(q)(ii) is imposed upon the person or persons who previously held a controlling interest in the entity.(r) A qualified sale of a manufactured/mobile home community, as defined in RCW 59.20.030, that takes place on or after June 12, 2008, but before December 31, 2018.(s)(i) A transfer of a qualified low-income housing development or controlling interest in a qualified low-income housing development, unless, due to noncompliance with federal statutory requirements, the seller is subject to recapture, in whole or in part, of its allocated federal low-income housing tax credits within the four years prior to the date of transfer.(ii) For purposes of this subsection (3)(s), "qualified low-income housing development" means real property and improvements in respect to which the seller or, in the case of a transfer of a controlling interest, the owner or beneficial owner, was allocated federal low-income housing tax credits authorized under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 42 or successor statute, by the Washington state housing finance commission or successor state-authorized tax credit allocating agency.(iii) This subsection (3)(s) does not apply to transfers of a qualified low-income housing development or controlling interest in a qualified low-income housing development occurring on or after July 1, 2035.(iv) The Washington state housing finance commission, in consultation with the department, must gather data on: (A) The fiscal savings, if any, accruing to transferees as a result of the exemption provided in this subsection (3)(s); (B) the extent to which transferors of qualified low-income housing developments receive consideration, including any assumption of debt, as part of a transfer subject to the exemption provided in this subsection (3)(s); and (C) the continued use of the property for low-income housing. The Washington state housing finance commission must provide this information to the joint legislative audit and review committee. The committee must conduct a review of the tax preference created under this subsection (3)(s) in calendar year 2033, as required under chapter 43.136 RCW.(t)(i) A qualified transfer of residential property by a legal representative of a person with developmental disabilities to a qualified entity subject to the following conditions:(A) The adult child with developmental disabilities of the transferor of the residential property must be allowed to reside in the residence or successor property so long as the placement is safe and appropriate as determined by the department of social and health services;(B) The title to the residential property is conveyed without the receipt of consideration by the legal representative of a person with developmental disabilities to a qualified entity;(C) The residential property must have no more than four living units located on it; and(D) The residential property transferred must remain in continued use for 50 years by the qualified entity as supported living for persons with developmental disabilities by the qualified entity or successor entity. If the qualified entity sells or otherwise conveys ownership of the residential property the proceeds of the sale or conveyance must be used to acquire similar residential property and such similar residential property must be considered the successor for continued use. The property will not be considered in continued use if the department of social and health services finds that the property has failed, after a reasonable time to remedy, to meet any health and safety statutory or regulatory requirements. If the department of social and health services determines that the property fails to meet the requirements for continued use, the department of social and health services must notify the department and the real estate excise tax based on the value of the property at the time of the transfer into use as residential property for persons with developmental disabilities becomes immediately due and payable by the qualified entity. The tax due is not subject to penalties, fees, or interest under this title.(ii) For the purposes of this subsection (3)(t) the definitions in RCW 71A.10.020 apply.(iii) A "qualified entity" is:(A) A nonprofit organization under Title 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue code of 1986, as amended, as of June 7, 2018, or a subsidiary under the same taxpayer identification number that provides residential supported living for persons with developmental disabilities; or(B) A nonprofit adult family home, as defined in RCW 70.128.010, that exclusively serves persons with developmental disabilities.(iv) In order to receive an exemption under this subsection (3)(t) an affidavit must be submitted by the transferor of the residential property and must include a copy of the transfer agreement and any other documentation as required by the department.(u)(i) A sale or transfer of real property to a qualifying grantee that uses the property for housing for low-income persons and receives or otherwise qualifies the property for an exemption from real and personal property taxes under RCW 84.36.560, 84.36.049, 35.82.210, 35.21.755, or 84.36.010. For purposes of this subsection (3)(u), "qualifying grantee" means a nonprofit entity as defined in RCWÂ  84.36.560, a nonprofit entity or qualified cooperative association as defined in RCW 84.36.049, a housing authority created under RCWÂ  35.82.030Â orÂ  35.82.300, a public corporation established under RCWÂ  35.21.660Â orÂ  35.21.730, or a county or municipal corporation. A qualifying grantee that is a county or municipal corporation must record a covenant at the time of transfer that prohibits using the property for any purpose other than for low-income housing for a period of at least 10 years. At a minimum, the covenant must address price restrictions and household income limits for the low-income housing. A qualifying grantee must comply with the requirements described in (u)(i)(A), (B), or (C) of this subsection and must also certify, by affidavit at the time of sale or transfer, that it intends to comply with those requirements.(A) If the qualifying grantee intends to operate existing housing on the property, within ((one year))24 months of the sale or transfer:(I) The qualifying grantee must receive or qualify the property for a tax exemption under RCWÂ  84.36.560, 84.36.049, 35.82.210,Â  35.21.755, orÂ  84.36.010; and(II) The property must be used as housing for low-income persons.(B) If the qualifying grantee intends to develop new housing on the site, within five years of the sale or transfer:(I) The qualifying grantee must receive or qualify the property for a tax exemption under RCWÂ  84.36.560, 84.36.049, 35.82.210,Â  35.21.755, orÂ  84.36.010; and(II) The property must be used as housing for low-income persons.(C) If the qualifying grantee intends to substantially rehabilitate the premises as defined in RCWÂ  59.18.200, within three years:(I) The qualifying grantee must receive or qualify the property for a tax exemption under RCWÂ  84.36.560, 84.36.049, 35.82.210,Â  35.21.755, orÂ  84.36.010; and(II) The property must be used as housing for low-income persons.(ii) If the qualifying grantee fails to satisfy the requirements described in (u)(i)(A), (B), or (C) of this subsection, within the timelines described in (u)(i)(A), (B), or (C) of this subsection, the qualifying grantee must pay the tax that would have otherwise been due at the time of initial transfer, plus interest calculated from the date of initial transfer pursuant to RCWÂ  82.32.050.(iii) If a qualifying grantee transfers the property to a different qualifying grantee within the original timelines described in (u)(i)(A), (B), or (C) of this subsection, neither the original qualifying grantee nor the new qualifying grantee is required toÂ pay the tax, so long as the new qualifying grantee satisfies the requirements as described in (u)(i)(A), (B), or (C) of this subsection within the exemption period of the initial transfer. If the new qualifying grantee fails to satisfy the requirements described in (u)(i)(A), (B), or (C) of this subsection, only the new qualifying grantee is liable for the payment of taxes required by (u)(ii) of this subsection. There is no limit on the number of transfers between qualifying grantees within the original timelines.(iv) Each affidavit must be filed with the department upon completion of the sale or transfer of property, including transfers from a qualifying grantee to a different qualifying grantee. The qualifying grantee must provide proof to the department as required by the department once the requirements as described in (u)(i)(A), (B), or (C) of this subsection have been satisfied.(v) For the purposes of this subsection (3)(u), "low-income" means household income as defined by the department, provided that the definition may not exceed 80 percent of median household income, adjusted for household size, for the county in which the dwelling is located.(v)(i) The sale of qualified space in a development that qualifies for a property tax exemption under RCW 84.36.560, 84.36.049, 35.82.210, 35.21.755, or 84.36.010 to a nonprofit organization, a housing authority, or public corporation for use for an exempt community purpose.(ii) For the purposes of this subsection (3)(v), the following definitions apply:(A) "Affordable housing development" means a development with housing provided to households with a household income that does not exceed 80 percent of median household income at initial occupancy, adjusted for household size, for the county in which the dwelling is located.(B) "Exempt community purpose" means any use to provide a service that benefits affordable housing development tenants or the public including, but not limited to, health clinics, senior day care, food banks, community centers, and early learning facilities.(C) "Nonprofit organization" means an organization exempt from taxation under section 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3)), as amended.(D) "Qualified space" means any portion of an affordable housing development that is accessible to tenants or the public that constitutes a separate legal parcel of property under chapter 64.32, 64.34, or 64.90 RCW.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6. Section 4 of this act expires January 1, 2030.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 7. Section 5 of this act takes effect January 1, 2030.--- END ---